Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5718.01
Electronic smoking device, defined.

Electronic smoking device means an electronic nicotine delivery system as defined in section 28-1418.01. The term includes any such device regardless of whether it is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, e-hookah, or vape pen or under any other product name or descriptor. The term also includes any substance that is used in an electronic smoking device. The term does not include a diffuser, humidifier, prescription inhaler, or similar device.

Laws 2020, LB840, § 4.